Colorado statutes. TITLE 44 Revenue - Regulation of Activities
PART 5
LICENSING AND REGISTRATION

44-32-501. Regulation of race meets and racing-related businesses.

The commission shall license and regulate all race meets with pari-mutuel wagering held in this state at which horses participate, and shall cause the places where the race meets are held to be visited and inspected at least once a year by its members or employees, and shall require all places to be constructed, maintained, and operated in accordance with the laws of this state and the rules of the commission.

The commission shall license and regulate all kennels and stables housing racing animals both in connection with a race meet and to protect the general health and welfare of horses. The commission shall cause the kennels and stables to be visited and inspected at least once a year by its members or employees and shall require all such places to be constructed, maintained, and operated in accordance with the laws of this state and the rules of the commission.

The commission shall, at its own expense, regulate the operations of pari-mutuel machines and equipment, the operations of all money rooms, accounting rooms, and sellers' and cashiers' windows, and the weighing of jockeys.
(2) (a) (I) The commission shall, at its own expense, regulate the operations of pari-mutuel machines and equipment, the operations of all money rooms, accounting rooms, and sellers' and cashiers' windows, and the weighing of jockeys.

The commission shall at its own expense take or cause to be taken saliva, urine, blood, hair, or other body fluid samples or biopsy or necropsy specimens from horses selected by the commission or its employees at race meets provided for under this article 32 or when concerns are raised as to a particular animal, including the winner of a race, and shall test and determine the samples or specimens or cause the samples or specimens to be tested and determined.

To protect the health and safety of licensees, racing employees, and the general public, and to ensure the orderly conduct of race meets, the commission may at its own expense take or cause to be taken, for cause or by random selection, saliva, urine, blood, hair, or other body fluid samples from licensees. The commission shall promulgate reasonable rules identifying the license categories subject to testing. The commission shall designate license categories subject to testing based on the nature of the work performed or proximity to dangerous conditions in the sport of horse racing. Samples may be collected by division employees or by certified contractors in connection with race meets. The rules must include a listing of prohibited substances. The commission shall test and determine the samples or specimens, or cause the samples or specimens to be tested, to determine the presence of any prohibited substance that may cause impairment, or mask or dilute the presence of a prohibited substance.

The commission, at its own expense and in addition to other employees, shall employ or contract with competent doctors, accountants, chemists, and other persons necessary to supervise the conduct of race meets and to ascertain that this article 32 and the rules of the commission are strictly complied with. The commission shall also seek innovative and efficient methods of testing humans and horses for prohibited substances to ensure the safety of humans and horses and maintain the integrity of racing. Through its bidding process, the commission shall invite laboratories to include proposals for testing procedures and methods that would maintain or improve the effectiveness of test results and minimize testing cost incurred by the state or the racing industry.

The commission shall establish and require compliance with internal control procedures for licensees, including accounting and reporting procedures.

The commission shall license and regulate persons who manufacture or operate totalizators and shall require all totalizators to be manufactured, maintained, and operated in accordance with the laws of this state and rules of the commission.

The commission may license and regulate persons outside of Colorado who conduct pari-mutuel wagering on simulcast races and who accept wagers from Colorado residents at out-of-state simulcast facilities, and shall require out-of-state simulcast facilities to be maintained and operated in accordance with the laws of this state and rules of the commission. Source market fees imposed on persons licensed under this subsection (2)(d) shall not exceed ten percent of the gross receipts of all pari-mutuel wagering by Colorado residents conducted by the persons at out-of-state simulcast facilities.

The commission shall license and regulate all in-state simulcast facilities conducting pari-mutuel wagering and shall require all such in-state simulcast facilities to be maintained and operated in accordance with the laws of this state and rules of the commission.

The commission shall, at its own expense, specifically regulate the operation by in-state simulcast facilities of pari-mutuel machines and equipment, the operation of all money and accounting facilities, and the operation of sellers' and cashiers' windows and ensure that the in-state simulcast facility is handling wagering as part of the pari-mutuel system of the appropriate track or simulcast facility and as part of the appropriate pari-mutuel pool, as designated in section 44-32-703. For such purposes, the commission, at its own expense, and in addition to other employees, shall employ the competent personnel necessary to supervise the wagering through in-state simulcast facilities and to ascertain that this article 32 and the rules of the commission are strictly complied with.

A licensed track or its additional facility may be used for nonracing events upon advance notice to the commission, subject to the authority of the commission and the division to take all measures reasonably necessary to ensure that the nonracing events do not interfere with the safe and proper conduct of racing or the suitability of the track for racing.

Source:

L. 2018:

(1)(b) and (2)(a) amended, (SB 18-172), ch. 129, p. 851, § 2, effective April 12; entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1024), ch. 26, p. 295, § 2, effective October 1.

44-32-502. Delegation of authority to issue certain licenses and registrations - rules.

The commission shall delegate to the division the authority to issue all business and occupational licenses and registrations contemplated in this article 32, and shall promulgate rules containing standards for the delegation. The commission shall not delegate its duty to issue or renew race meet licenses.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1024), ch. 26, p. 297, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-60-502 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-32-503. Rules of commission - licensing - record check.

The commission shall make reasonable rules for licensees to ensure:

Fair play;

The proper and safe conduct of the sport of horse racing;

The health, safety, and welfare of persons and horses involved in a racing meet; and

The high standards and integrity of the sport of horse racing.

The commission rules shall also provide for the control, safety, supervision, fingerprinting, identification, and direction of applicants, registrants, and licensees. Commission rules shall provide for:

(I) The supervising, disciplining, suspending, fining, and barring from racing of all persons required to be licensed or registered by this article 32;

(II) A program for testing designated licensees for cause or by random selection to detect prohibited substances; and

(III) The holding, conducting, and operating of all races, race meets, racetracks, in-state simulcast facilities, and out-of-state wagering on simulcast races conducted pursuant to this article 32. The commission shall announce the place, time, number of races per day, duration of race meets, as provided in section 44-32-603, and types of race meets.

The commission may issue a temporary license or registration for up to a maximum of ninety days for any license or registration authorized under this article 32.

Every person holding a license or registration under this article 32, every person operating an in-state simulcast facility, and every owner or trainer of any horse entered in a racing contest under this article 32 shall comply with the commission's rules and orders. It is unlawful for a person to work upon the premises of a racetrack without first obtaining from the commission a license or registration under this article 32; except that the commission may waive this licensing or registration requirement for occupational categories that the commission, in its discretion, deems unnecessary to be licensed or registered. This licensing or registration requirement does not apply to the members of the commission or its employees or to persons whose only participation is individually as spectator or bettor. It is unlawful for a person who owns or leases a racing animal to allow the animal to race in this state without first obtaining an owner's license or registration from the commission, as prescribed by the rules of the commission. The commission may extend the validity of a license issued for a period not to exceed three years, and the fee for the license shall be increased proportionately; except that no temporary license or registration may be issued for a period longer than ninety days. It is unlawful for a person to hold a race meet with pari-mutuel wagering without obtaining a license for pari-mutuel wagering. It is unlawful for a person to operate an in-state simulcast facility unless that person is a licensee that has been licensed within the year to hold a race meet or is a licensee that has a written simulcast racing agreement with the in-state host track or out-of-state host track from which the simulcast race is broadcast and has filed a copy of the written simulcast racing agreement with the commission before operating as an in-state simulcast facility.

No person holding a license under this article 32 shall extend credit to another person for participation in pari-mutuel wagering.

With the submission of an application for a license granted pursuant to this article 32, each applicant shall submit a set of fingerprints to the commission. The commission shall forward the fingerprints to the Colorado bureau of investigation for the purpose of conducting a state and national fingerprint-based criminal history record check utilizing records of the Colorado bureau of investigation and the federal bureau of investigation. Only the actual costs of the record check must be borne by the applicant. Nothing in this subsection (4) precludes the commission from making further inquiries into the background of the applicant.

When the results of a fingerprint-based criminal history record check of an applicant performed pursuant to this subsection (4) reveal a record of arrest without a disposition, the commission shall require that applicant to submit to a name-based judicial record check, as defined in section 22-2-119.3 (6)(d).

Source:

L. 2018:

(1) amended, (SB 18-172), ch. 129, p. 852, § 3, effective April 12; entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1024), ch. 26, p. 297, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2019:

(4) amended, (HB 19-1166), ch. 125, p. 563, § 65, effective April 18.

L. 2022:

(4)(b) amended, (HB 22-1270), ch. 114, p. 536, § 62, effective April 21.

44-32-504. Business licenses.

Every application for a business license, excluding applications for initial or renewal race meet licenses pursuant to sections 44-32-505 and 44-32-512, shall be made under oath and filed with the commission and shall set forth the information as the rules of the commission may require in connection with the application.

To determine whether a license shall be granted, the commission shall have the right to examine the financial and other records of the applicant and to compel the production of records and documents.

The commission has discretion to grant or deny a business license if it finds that any applicant or any of the directors, officers, or original stockholders of a corporate applicant have violated any of the provisions of this article 32 or any rules of the commission, or failed to pay any of the sums required under this article 32, or as it determines, from the application, the character, financial ability, and experience of each individual applicant or the officers and director of each corporate applicant to be for the best interests of the state and the racing industry.

When conducting investigations pursuant to this section, to the extent possible, the commission shall utilize investigative information of other state racing jurisdictions. The commission may investigate an existing licensee who is seeking to acquire ownership of another existing license.

Any unexpired license held by any person who has been convicted by the commission of violating any of the provisions of this article 32 or any rule of the commission, or who has willfully or fraudulently made any false statement in any application for a license, or who fails to pay to the commission any and all sums required under the provisions of this article 32 is subject to cancellation or revocation by the commission.

The commission shall have the power to issue subpoenas for the appearance of persons and the production of documents and other things in connection with applications before the commission or in the conduct of investigations.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1024), ch. 26, p. 298, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-60-504 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-32-505. Meet licenses.

Every initial application for a license to hold race meets under this article 32 shall be made under oath and shall be filed with the commission on or before a day fixed by the commission and shall set forth the time, the place, and the number of days the meet shall continue; the kind of racing proposed to be conducted; the full name and address of the applicant and, if a corporation, the names and addresses of all of its officers and directors and all of the holders of each class of its stock and the amount of stock of each class so owned by each stockholder; the location of the racetrack and whether the racetrack is owned or leased; the names and residences of the owners of all property leased by the applicant; a statement of the assets and liabilities of the applicant; a description of the qualifications and experience of the applicant if an individual or of its officers and directors if a corporation; a full disclosure of all holding or intermediary companies associated with the applicant, as well as their shareholders, all contracts that relate to the race meet, audited balance sheets of corporate applicants, excluding nonprofit associations, and the terms and conditions of all contracts by which the applicant has received credit; a description of the land uses within a radius of two miles of the establishment in which the race meet is proposed to be conducted; and the incidental information as the rules of the commission may require in connection with the application.

Upon the filing of the application, the commission shall fix a date for a hearing on the application, and the applicant shall give public notice of the time and place of the hearing by publication in one issue of a daily or weekly newspaper of general circulation in the area in which it is proposed to conduct the race meet and by posting on the site of the proposed race meet a notice, in form and size to be determined by the commission, that the application has been filed and the date and place of the hearing thereon. At the time and place mentioned in the notice, the commission shall conduct a public hearing at which evidence for and against the granting of the application may be presented.

Except as otherwise limited by the provisions of this article 32, in considering an application for a license under this section, the commission may give consideration to the number of licenses already granted, and to the location of tracks previously licensed, and to the sentiments and character of the community in which the proposed race meets are to be conducted, and to the ability, character, and experience of each individual applicant or the officers and directors of each corporate applicant. The commission may require of every applicant for a license to hold a race meet, except a public nonprofit association, nonprofit corporation, or nonprofit fair, including the Colorado state fair and all county fairs, who has not, within five years prior to making an application for a license to hold a race meet, operated a race meet in the county, city, or city and county in which it is proposed to hold the race meet, a recommendation in writing of the board of county commissioners of the county in the event the race meet is to be held in unincorporated areas of the county or of the governing board of a city or city and county if the proposed race meet is to be held within a city or city and county. The commission may take the recommendation into consideration before granting or refusing the license. The commission may deny a license to operate a new racetrack to a person who is already licensed to operate a racetrack within this or any other state if, in the opinion of the commission, the granting of the license would discourage legitimate competition from other qualified applicants. The commission shall investigate any applicant and shall require the applicant to pay the actual cost of investigating the application as part of the fees and costs imposed pursuant to section 44-32-506. The applicant shall advance the money necessary for the investigation to the commission, and the commission shall return any unused portion of the money to the applicant at the conclusion of the commission's investigation. The advance of the money may either be made directly to the commission or the money may be deposited into escrow in a manner approved by the commission.

The commission may grant or refuse licenses to conduct race meets under this article 32 as it determines, from the application, the character, financial ability, and experience of each individual applicant or the officers and directors of each corporate applicant, the sentiments of the community and the character of the area wherein it is proposed to conduct the race meets, and the evidence presented at the hearing, to be for the best interests of the state, the racing industry, and the area in which it is proposed to conduct the race meets.

The commission has discretion to grant or deny a race meet license if it finds that any applicant has, or any of the directors, officers, or original stockholders of a corporate applicant have, violated any of the provisions of this article 32 or any rules of the commission or failed to pay any of the sums required under this article 32.

Every license issued under this article 32 shall specify the number of days the licensed race meet shall continue and the number of races per day. No license shall be granted to any individual who is not a bona fide resident of Colorado nor to any foreign corporation. Every applicant shall agree that, if granted a license under this article 32, the applicant will not thereafter sell, mortgage, or otherwise pledge or dispose of any of the assets listed and described on the application for a license or a renewal license without thirty days' prior notice to the commission, which may approve or disapprove the disposition of assets upon good cause shown. The charter of all corporate applicants shall contain a provision that, when a cumulative ten percent or more of the voting stock of the corporation is to be sold, mortgaged, or otherwise pledged or transferred, thirty days' prior notice shall be given to the commission. The corporation shall pay an investigation fee to the commission as part of the fees and costs imposed pursuant to section 44-32-506. The commission shall approve or disapprove of the disposition of the stock, upon good cause shown, within ninety days of the filing of a completed application for transfer. The commission has the power to ascertain if any capital stock of any corporate applicant or licensee is held with the intent to mislead or deceive the commission for an undisclosed principal. The involvement of an undisclosed principal shall be grounds for the denial, suspension, or revocation of a license.

Upon petition by the licensee and a finding by the commission that it is impossible or impractical for a licensee, because of fire or act of God or other unforeseeable emergency not caused or participated in by the licensee, to conduct a race meet upon the dates allocated or upon a racetrack designated by the commission to the licensee, other dates and locations may be substituted and granted to the licensee. A licensee so petitioning may be granted the right to lease and utilize any other licensee's facilities for the term of the petitioning licensee's annual permit or any portion thereof, but the grant shall not be construed to allow any licensee more days of racing in any year than are prescribed by this article 32.

When conducting investigations pursuant to subsections (3) and (6) of this section, to the extent possible, the commission shall utilize investigative information of other state racing jurisdictions. The commission may investigate an existing licensee who is seeking to acquire ownership of another existing license to conduct race meets.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1024), ch. 26, p. 299, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-60-505 as it existed prior to 2018.

Cross references:

For the authority of the executive director of the department of regulatory agencies to change the period of validity and renewal date of any license or certificate issued by any examining or licensing board or commission in the division of professions and occupations, see § 12-20-202 (1)(b) to (1)(e), (2), and (3). For race meets at the Colorado state fair and industrial exposition, see § 35-65-116.

44-32-506. Application - fee - waiver of confidentiality.

In connection with the issuance of licenses or registrations, the commission shall establish investigation and application fees, which fees shall be credited to the racing cash fund created in section 44-32-205.

The application form created by the commission shall include a waiver of any right of confidentiality and a provision that allows the information contained in the application to be accessible to law enforcement agents of this or any other state or the government of the United States. The waiver of confidentiality shall extend to any financial or personnel record, wherever maintained.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1024), ch. 26, p. 301, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-60-506 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-32-507. Investigation - denial, suspension, and revocation actions against licensees - unlawful acts.

The commission upon its own motion may, and upon complaint in writing of any person shall, investigate the activities of any licensee or applicant within the state or any person upon the premises of any facility licensed pursuant to this article 32. In addition to its authority under any other provision of this article 32, the commission may issue a letter of admonition to a licensee, fine a licensee, suspend a license, deny an application for a license, or revoke a license, if the person has committed any of the following violations:

Disregarding or violating any provision of this article 32 or any rule promulgated by the commission in the interests of the public and in conformance with the provisions of this article 32;

Been convicted of, or entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to, a criminal charge under the laws of this or any other state or of the United States, or entered into a plea bargain for acts or omissions that, if committed in Colorado, would have been grounds for discipline in this state. A certified copy of the judgment of the court in which any such conviction occurred shall be presumptive evidence of the conviction in any hearing under this article 32. This subsection (1)(b) shall be applied in accordance with section 24-5-101.

Current prosecution or pending charges in any jurisdiction, against the applicant, or any of its officers or directors, or any of its general partners, or any stockholders, limited partners, or other persons having a financial or equity interest of five percent or greater in the applicant, for any felony; except that, at the request of the applicant or the person charged, the commission shall defer decision upon the application during the pendency of the charge;

Fraud, willful misrepresentation, or deceit in racing;

Failure to disclose to the commission complete ownership or beneficial interest in a racing animal entered to be raced;

Misrepresentation or attempted misrepresentation in connection with the sale of a racing animal or other matter pertaining to racing or registration of racing animals;

Failure to comply with any order or rulings of the commission, the stewards, the judges, or a racing official pertaining to a racing matter;

Ownership of any interest in or participation by any manner in any bookmaking, pool-selling, touting, bet solicitation, or illegal enterprise;

Employing or harboring unlicensed persons on the premises of a racetrack;

Being a person, employing a person, or being assisted by a person who is not of good record or good moral character;

Discontinuance of or ineligibility for the activity for which the license was issued;

Being currently under suspension or revocation of a racing license in another racing jurisdiction, or having been subject to disciplinary action by the commission or equivalent agency of another jurisdiction for acts or omissions that, if committed in Colorado, would have been grounds for discipline in this state; except that this subsection (1)(l) shall not furnish the basis for the imposition of fines;

Possession on the premises of a racetrack of:

Firearms; or

A battery, buzzer, electrical device, or other appliance other than a whip that could be used to alter the speed of a racing animal in a race or while working out or schooling;

Possession, on the premises of a racetrack, by a person other than a licensed veterinarian, of:

A hypodermic needle, hypodermic syringe, or other similar device;

Any substance, compound items, or combination thereof of any medicine, narcotic, stimulant, depressant, or anesthetic that could alter the normal performance of a racing animal unless specifically authorized by the commission veterinarian;

Cruelty to or neglect of a racing animal;

Offering, promising, giving, accepting, or soliciting a bribe in any form, directly or indirectly, to or by a person having any connection with the outcome of a race, or failure to report knowledge of the act immediately to the stewards, the judges, or the commission;

Causing, attempting to cause, or participating in any way in any attempt to cause the prearrangement of a race result, or failure to report knowledge of the act immediately to the stewards, the judges, or the commission;

Entering, or aiding and abetting the entry of, a racing animal ineligible or unqualified for the race entered;

Willfully or unjustifiably entering or racing of any animal in any race under any name or designation other than the name or designation assigned to the animal by and registered with the official recognized registry for that breed of animal, or willfully soliciting, instigating, engaging in or in any way furthering any act by which any racing animal is entered or raced in any race under any name or designation other than the name or designation duly assigned by and registered with the official recognized registry for that breed of animal;

Aiding or abetting any person in the violation of any rule of the commission;

Racing at a racetrack without having a racing animal registered to race at that racetrack;

Being on the premises of a racetrack for which the licensee is required to be licensed without being able to show proof of gainful employment at that racetrack;

Failing to comply with the requirements of article 33 of this title 44 or any rule promulgated by the executive director pursuant to section 44-33-108 (3).

The director may summarily suspend the license of any person pending a hearing concerning violation of subsection (1)(o) of this section.

Any person who fails to pay within the time period established by rule a fine imposed pursuant to this article 32 shall pay, in addition to the fine due, a penalty amount equal to the fine. Any person who submits to the department through the division a check in payment of a fine or license fee requirement imposed pursuant to this article 32, which check is not honored by the financial institution upon which it is drawn, shall pay, in addition to the fine or fee due, a penalty amount equal to the fine or fee. All money received pursuant to a penalty amount imposed by this subsection (3) shall be credited to the general fund of the state.

Any person aggrieved by a final action or order of the commission may appeal the action to the Colorado court of appeals.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1024), ch. 26, p. 301, § 2, effective October 1; IP(1) and (1)(w) amended, (SB 18-035), ch. 15, p. 258, § 5, effective October 1.

44-32-508. License - mandatory disqualification - criteria.

The commission shall deny a license to any applicant on the basis of any of the following criteria:

Failure of the applicant to prove by clear and convincing evidence that the applicant is qualified in accordance with the provisions of this article 32;

Failure of the applicant to provide information, documentation, and assurances required by this article 32 or requested by the commission, failure of the applicant to reveal any fact material to qualification, or the supplying of information that is untrue or misleading as to a material fact pertaining to the qualification criteria;

Conviction of the applicant, or any of its officers or directors, or any of its general partners, or any stockholders, limited partners, or other persons having a financial or equity interest of five percent or greater in the applicant, of any of the following:

Any gambling-related offense or theft by deception;

Any crime involving fraud or misrepresentation committed within ten years prior to the date of the application, notwithstanding the provisions of section 24-5-101;

Current prosecution or pending charges in any jurisdiction against the applicant, or against any person listed in subsection (1)(c) of this section, for any of the offenses enumerated in subsection (1)(c) of this section; except that, at the request of the applicant or the person charged, the commission shall defer decision upon the application during the pendency of the charge.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1024), ch. 26, p. 304, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-60-507.5 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-32-509. Hearings - review - rules.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, all proceedings before the commission with respect to the denial, suspension, or revocation of licenses or the imposition of fines shall be conducted pursuant to the provisions of sections 24-4-104 and 24-4-105.

The proceedings shall be held in the county where the commission has its office or in such other place as the commission may designate. The commission shall notify the applicant or licensee by mailing by first-class mail a copy of the written notice required to the last address furnished by the applicant or licensee to the commission.

The commission may delegate its authority to conduct hearings and impose discipline with respect to the denial or suspension of licenses or the imposition of a fine to the division, through its board of stewards or judges, or a hearing officer. Proceedings before the division, through its board of stewards or judges, or a hearing officer shall not be governed by the procedural or other requirements of sections 24-4-104 and 24-4-105, but rather shall be conducted in accordance with rules adopted by the commission.

The commission may direct that any hearing be conducted before an administrative law judge appointed pursuant to part 10 of article 30 of title 24.

The commission, the division, through its board of stewards or judges, and any hearing officer shall have the authority to administer oaths and affirmations, sign and issue subpoenas and order the production of documents and other evidence, and regulate the course of the hearing, pursuant to rules adopted by the commission.

Any party aggrieved by a final order or ruling issued by the division, through its board of stewards or judges, or a hearing officer shall have a right to appeal the order or ruling to the commission, pursuant to procedural rules that shall be adopted by the commission. The aggrieved party may petition the commission for a stay of execution pending appeal to the commission.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1024), ch. 26, p. 304, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-60-508 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-32-510. Liability insurance - bond for race meets.

For the protection of the public and the exhibitors, contestants, and visitors, every person licensed to conduct a race meet under the provisions of this article 32 shall carry public liability insurance in the form of a contract and with a company to be approved by the commission.

An organization representing the majority of the owners of racing animals participating in any race meet may require the licensee conducting the race meet to provide and deliver to the commission evidence of a bond signed by a surety company authorized to do business in this state, in an amount sufficient to cover all awards and purses due to the contestants at the race meet and conditioned that the licensee will pay and discharge all obligations to the contestants in connection with the race meet.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1024), ch. 26, p. 305, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-60-509 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-32-511. Racing of standardbred harness horses.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article 32 to the contrary, the commission shall grant licenses to conduct the racing of standardbred harness horses pursuant to the provisions of this article 32 and in accordance with subsections (2) and (3) of this section.

The licenses granted may be issued to conduct not more than three race meets in any one year at a racetrack specifically designed and used for the racing of no animals other than standardbred harness horses, but the race meets may not be held on the same dates as race meets authorized by the commission for animals other than standardbred harness horses that are held within forty miles of the track licensed for the racing of standardbred harness horses. In addition, licenses may be issued by the commission to conduct three race meets for the racing of standardbred harness horses in any one year at any racetrack at which horse race meets are held and that is not within forty miles of any other racetrack licensed for the racing of horses or the racing of standardbred harness horses.

No tracks licensed for the racing of standardbred harness horses may be located within forty miles of one another, but the tracks may be located within forty miles of any track licensed for the racing of animals other than standardbred harness horses subject to the limitations in subsection (2) of this section.

The provisions of subsection (3) of this section shall not restrict the right of a county to conduct extended standardbred harness horse race meets, upon being licensed by the commission, at a county fairground if the race meets are not within fifteen miles of any racetrack licensed in Colorado for the racing of horses.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1024), ch. 26, p. 305, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-60-510 as it existed prior to 2018.